en: E957, Thaumatin
xx: E957
ar: E957, ثوماتين
az: E957, Taumatin
bg: E957, Тауматин
ca: E957, Taumatina
cs: E957, Thaumatin, E 957
da: E957, Thaumatin
de: E957, Thaumatin, E 957
el: E957, Θαυματίνη
eo: E957, Taŭmatino
es: E957, Taumatina, E 957
et: E957, Thaumatiin
fa: E957, توماتین
fi: E957, Taumatiini, Taumatiinia
fr: E957, Thaumatine, thaumatines, Thaumatin, 53850-34-3, E 957
ga: E957, Taumatain
gl: E957, Taumatina
he: E957, תאומטין
hi: E957, थौमेटिन
hr: E957, Taumatin
hu: E957, tuamitin
id: E957, Thaumatin
it: E957, Taumatina
ja: E957, ソーマチン
ko: E957, 타우마틴
lt: E957, Taumatino
lv: E957, Taumatīns
mk: E957, Тауматин
ms: E957, Taumatin
mt: E957, Tàwmatin
nl: E957, Thaumatine
pl: E957, Taumatyna
pt: E957, Taumatina
ro: E957, Thaumatina
ru: E957, Тауматин
sk: E957, Taumatín
sl: E957, Taumatin
sq: E957, Thaumatin
sr: E957, Тауматин
sv: E957, Taumatin, E 957
th: E957, ทอมาทิน
tr: E957, Taumatin
uk: E957, Тауматин
vi: E957, Thaumatin
zh: E957, 索马甜

en: E958, Glycyrrhizin
xx: E958
ar: E958, غليسيريزين
az: E958, Qlisirrizin
bg: E958, Глициризин
ca: E958, Glicirrizina
cs: E958, Glycyrrhizin
da: E958, Glycyrrhizin
de: E958, Glycyrrhizin, Glycyrrhizinsäure, Glycyrrhetinsäure
el: E958, Γλυκυρριζίνη
eo: E958, Glicirizino
es: E958, Glicirricina
et: E958, Glütsürrisiin
fi: E958, Glysyrritsiini, Glysyrritsiiniä
fr: E958, Acide glycyrrhizique et sels, Glycyrrhizine, Liquorice, Acide glycyrrhizique, C42H62O16, Glycyrrhyzine, 1405-86-3, Acide glycyrrhizinique
he: E958, גליציריזין
hu: E958, Glicirrizin
it: E958, Glicirrizina, C42H62O16
ja: E958, グリチルリチン
ko: E958, 글리시리진
lt: E958, Glicirizinas
lv: E958, Glicirizīns
nl: E958, Glycyrrhizinezuur, (3-beta\,20-beta)-20-carboxy-11-oxo-30-norolean-12-en-3-yl 2-O-beta-D-glucopyraanuronosyl-alfa-D-glucopyranosiduronzuur, Glycyrrhizine
pl: E958, Glicyryzyna
pt: E958, Glicirrizina
ro: E958, Glicirizină
ru: E958, Глицирризин
sk: E958, Glycyrrhizín
sl: E958, Glicirizin
sv: E958, Glycyrrhizin
tr: E958, Glisirizin
uk: E958, Гліциризин
zh: E958, 甘草甜素

en: E959, Neohesperidine dihydrochalcone, Neohesperidin dihydrochalcone, Neohesperidine DC, NHDC
xx: E959
bg: E959, Неохесперидин дихидрохалкон
ca: E959, Neohesperidina dihidrocalcona, Neohesperidina DC
cs: E959, Neohesperidin dc, Neohesperidindihydrochalkon, NHDC
da: E959, Neohesperidindihydrochalcon
de: E959, Neohesperidin dc, Neohesperidin-Dihydrochalkon, NHDC, Neohesperidin, Neohesperidindihydrochalkon, E 959
el: E959, Νεοεσπεριδινη dc
es: E959, Neohesperidina dihidrocalcona, neohesperidina DC, NHDC, neohespiridina DC
et: E959, Neohesperidiindivesinikkalkoon
fa: E959, نئوهسپریدین دی هیدرو کالکون
fi: E959, Neohesperidiinidihydrokalkoni, Neohesperidiinidihydrokalkonia, neohesperidiini DC
fr: E959, Néohespéridine dihydrochalcone, NHDC, Dihydrochalcone de néohespéridine, néohespéridine DC, C28H36O15, 20702-77-6, Néohespiridine DC
gl: E959, Neohesperidina dihidrocalcona
hu: E959, Neoheszperidin-dihidro-kalkon
it: E959, Neoesperidina diidrocalcone, C28H36O15
lt: E959, Neohesperidinas dc, Citrozė
lv: E959, Neohesperidīns dc
mt: E959, Neoesperidina diidroċalkon
nl: E959, Neohesperidine-dihydrochalcon, Neohesperidine-DC, NHDC, Neohesperidine dihydrochalcon
pl: E959, Neohesperydyna diwodorochalkonu, Neohesperydyna dihydrochalkon
pt: E959, Neo-hesperidina dc
ro: E959, Dihidrocalconă de neohesperidină
sk: E959, Neohesperidín dc
sl: E959, Neohesperidin dc, Neohesperidin dihidroalkon, Neohesperidin
sr: E959, neohesperidin DC
sv: E959, Neohesperidin dc, Neohesperidindihydrochalkon, NHDC
zh: E959, 新橙皮苷二氢查耳酮

en: E960, Steviol glycosides, Steviol glycoside, stevia rebaudiana extract, stevia leaf extract, steviol
xx: E960
bg: E960, Стевиол гликозиди, листа от стевия, листа стевия, растителен екстракт на стевия
ca: E960, Glicòsid d'esteviol, Glicòsids d'esteviol
cs: E960, Steviol-glykosidy
da: E960, Steviolglycosider
de: E960, Steviolglycoside, Steviolglykoside, Stevia rebaudiana Extrakt, Süssungsmittel Steviol Glycoside, Steviol, steviablätter
el: E960, Γλυκοζιτες στεβιολης συνώνυμα
es: E960, Glucósidos de esteviol, Glicósidos de esteviol, estevia, extracto de hojas de estevia, infusión de hojas de estevia, stevia
et: E960, Steviooglükosiidid
fi: E960, Stevioliglykosidit, Stevioliglykosidejä, Steviaglykosidit, stevia rebaudiana -uute
fr: E960, Glucosides de stéviol, stévioside, rébaudioside A, extrait de stévia, glycosides de stéviol, Stévioside, extrait de feuille de Stévia, Stévia, extrait de stevia rebaudiana
hr: E960, steviol glikozid, steviol glikozidi, stevia list
hu: E960, Szteviol-glikozidok szinonimák
it: E960, Glicosidi dello steviolo, glicosidi steviolici, Estratto di stevia
ja: E960, ステビア
lt: E960, Steviolio glikozidai
lv: E960, Steviolglikozīdi
mt: E960, Glikosidi tal-istevjol
nb: E960, Steviolglykosider
nl: E960, Steviolglycosiden, Steviolglycoside, extract van Stevia Rebaudiana, glycosylstevioside
pl: E960, Glikozydy stewiolowe, ekstrakt ze Stevii Rebaudiana
pt: E960, Glicósidos de esteviol
ro: E960, Glicozide steviolice
sk: E960, Glykozidy steviolu synonymá
sl: E960, Steviol glikozidi
sr: E960, steviol glikozidi
sv: E960, Steviolglykosider
ta: E960, சிடீவியால் கிளைகோசைடு

en: E960a, Steviol glycosides from Stevia
xx: E960a
ar: E960a, جليكوسيدات ستيفيول من ستيفيا
az: E960a, Steviyadan Steviol qlikozidləri
bg: E960a, Стевиол гликозиди от Стевия
ca: E960a, Glicòsids d'esteviol procedents d'estèvia
cs: E960a, Steviol glykosidy ze Stévie
da: E960a, Steviolglycosider fra Stevia
de: E960a, Steviolglycoside aus Stevia
el: E960a, Γλυκοσίδες στεβιόλης από Στέβια
es: E960a, Glucósidos de esteviol procedentes de estevia
et: E960a, Steviolglükosiidid Steviast
fi: E960a, Stevioliglykosidit Steviasta, steviasta saatavat stevioliglykosidit
fr: E960a, Glycosides de stéviol issus de Stevia
he: E960a, גליקוזידים סטיביול מסטיביה
hi: E960a, स्टीविया से स्टीविओल ग्लाइकोसाइड
hr: E960a, Steviol glikozidi iz Stevije
hu: E960a, Steviol-glikozidok a Steviából
id: E960a, Steviol glikosida dari Stevia
it: E960a, Glicosidi steviolici da Stevia
ja: E960a, ステビアからのステビオール配糖体
ko: E960a, 스테비아에서 추출한 스테비올 배당체
lt: E960a, Steviolio glikozidai iš Stevia
lv: E960a, Steviola glikozīdi no Stevia
mk: E960a, Стевиол гликозиди од Стевиа
ms: E960a, Steviol glikosida daripada Stevia
mt: E960a, Glikosidi ta' stevjol minn Stevia
nl: E960a, Steviolglycosiden uit Stevia
pl: E960a, Glikozydy stewiolowe ze stewii
pt: E960a, Glicosídeos de esteviol provenientes de estévia
ro: E960a, Glicozide steviolice din Stevia
ru: E960a, Стевиол гликозиды из стевии
sk: E960a, Steviol glykozidy zo Stévie
sl: E960a, Steviol glikozidi iz Stevie
sq: E960a, Glikozidet Steviol nga Stevia
sr: E960a, Steviol glikozidi iz Stevije
sv: E960a, Steviolglykosider från Stevia
th: E960a, สตีวิออลไกลโคไซด์จากหญ้าหวาน
tr: E960a, Stevia'dan Steviol glikozitleri
uk: E960a, Стевіол глікозиди зі Стевії
vi: E960a, Glycoside Steviol từ Stevia
zh: E960a, 甜菊糖苷来自甜叶菊

en: E960b, Rebaudioside from multiple gene donors expressed in Yarrowia lipolityca
xx: E960b

en: E960c, Enzymatically produced steviol glycosides
xx: E960c
de: E960c, Enzymatisch hergestellte Steviolglycoside
es: E960c, Glucósidos de esteviol producidos enzimáticamente
fr: E960c, Glycosides de stéviol produits par voie enzymatique
it: E960c, Glicosidi steviolici prodotti enzimaticamente
nl: E960c, Enzymatisch geproduceerde steviolglycosiden
pt: E960c, Glicosídeos de esteviol produzidos enzimaticamente

en: E960d, Glucosylated steviol glycosides
xx: E960d
ar: E960d, جليكوسيدات ستيفيول جلوكوزيل
az: E960d, Qlükozilli Steviol qlikozidləri
bg: E960d, Глюкозилирани стевиол гликозиди
ca: E960d, Glicòsids d'esteviol glucosilat
cs: E960d, Glukosylované steviol-glykosidy
da: E960d, Glucosyleret steviolglycosider
de: E960d, Glycosylierte Steviolglycoside
el: E960d, Γλυκοζυλιωμένα γλυκοσίδια στεβιόλης
es: E960d, Glucósidos de esteviol glucosilados
et: E960d, Glükosüülitud stevioolglükosiidid
fi: E960d, Glukosylaatit stevioliglykosidit
fr: E960d, Glycosides de stéviol glucosylés
he: E960d, גליקוזידים סטיביול גלוקוזיל
hi: E960d, ग्लूकोसिलेटेड स्टीविओल ग्लाइकोसाइड
hr: E960d, Glukozilirani steviol glikozidi
hu: E960d, Glükozilezett szteviol-glikozidok
id: E960d, Steviol glikosida terglukosilasi
it: E960d, Glicosidi steviolici glucosilati
ja: E960d, グルコシル化ステビオール配糖体
ko: E960d, 글루코실화 스테비올 배당체
lt: E960d, Gliukozilinti steviolio glikozidai
lv: E960d, Glikozilēti steviolglikozīdi
mk: E960d, Гликозилирани стевиол гликозиди
ms: E960d, Steviol glikosida terglukosil
mt: E960d, Glikosidi ta' stevjol glukosilati
nl: E960d, Geglucosyleerde steviolglycosiden
pl: E960d, Glikozydy stewiolowe glukozylowane
pt: E960d, Glicosídeos de esteviol glicosilados
ro: E960d, Glicozide steviolice glucozilate
ru: E960d, Глюкозилированные стевиолгликозиды
sk: E960d, Glukozilované steviol glykozidy
sl: E960d, Glukozilirani steviol glikozidi
sq: E960d, Glikozidet steviol glukozil
sr: E960d, Гликозиловани стевиол гликозиди
sv: E960d, Glukosylerade steviolglykosider
th: E960d, สตีวิออลไกลโคไซด์กลูโคซิลเลต
tr: E960d, Glikosillenmiş steviol glikozitler
uk: E960d, Глюкозильовані стевіол глікозиди
vi: E960d, Glycoside Steviol Glucosyl hóa
zh: E960d, 葡萄糖基化甜菊醇糖苷

en: E961, Neotame
xx: E961
bg: E961, Неотам
ca: E961, Neotam
cs: E961, Neotam
da: E961, Neotam
de: E961, Neotam, E 961
el: E961, Νεοταμη
es: E961, Neotamo, Neotame
et: E961, Neotaam
fi: E961, Neotaami, Neotaamia
fr: E961, Néotame, C20H30N2O5, 165450-17-9, Superaspartame
hu: E961, Neotám
it: E961, Neotame, Neotamo
lt: E961, Neotamas
lv: E961, Neotams
mt: E961, Neotam
nl: E961, Neotaam
pl: E961, Neotam
pt: E961, Neotame
ro: E961, Neotam
sk: E961, Neotam
sl: E961, Neotam
sv: E961, Neotam, E 961

en: E962, Salt of aspartame-acesulfame, Aspartame-acesulfame, Aspartame-acesulfame salt, E-962, E 962
xx: E962
bg: E962, Сол на аспартам-ацесулфам, Аспартам-ацесулфам
ca: E962, Sal d'aspartam-acesulfam
cs: E962, Sůl aspartamu-acesulfamu
da: E962, Aspartam-acesulfamsalt, Aspartam-acesulfam
de: E962, Aspartam-acesulfamsalz, Aspartam-Acesulfam, Aspartam-Acesulfam-Salz
el: E962, Αλας ασπαρταμης-ακεσουλφαμης, Ασπαρτάμη- ακεσουλφάμη
es: E962, Sal de aspartamo-acesulfamo, Aspartamo-acesulfamo
et: E962, Aspartaam-atsesulfaamsool
fi: E962, Aspartaamiasesulfaamisuola, Aspartaamiasesulfaami, Aspartaamiasesulfaamisuolaa, Aspartaamiasesulfaamia
fr: E962, Sel d'aspartame-acésulfame, C18H23N3O9S, Aspartame-acésulfame, E 962, 106372-55-8, Twinsweet
hu: E962, Aszpartám-aceszulfámsó, Aszpartám-aceszulfám
it: E962, Sale di aspartame-acesulfame, Aspartame-acesulfame
lt: E962, Aspartamo-acesulfamo druska, Aspartamas-acesulfamas
lv: E962, Aspartāma acesulfāma sāls, Aspartāma acesulfāms
mt: E962, Melħ tal-aspartam u l-aċesulfam, Aspartam-aċesulfam
nl: E962, Aspartaam-acesulfaamzout, Aspartaam-acesulfaam
pl: E962, Sól aspartamu-acesulfamu, Aspartam-acesulfam
pt: E962, Sal de aspartame-acessulfame, Aspartame-acessulfame
ro: E962, Sare de aspartam-acesulfam, Aspartam-acesulfam
sh: E962, Aspartam-acesulfamska so
sk: E962, Soľ aspartám-acesulfámu, Aspartám-acesulfám
sl: E962, Sol aspartam-acesulfama, aspartam-acesulfam
sr: E962, Aspartam-acesulfamska so
sv: E962, Salt av aspartam och acesulfam, Aspartam och acesulfam, Aspartam-acesulfamsalt, E 962

en: E963, Tagatose
xx: E963
ar: E963, تاجتوز
az: E963, Taqatoza
bg: E963, Тагатоза
ca: E963, Tagatosa
cs: E963, Tagatóza
da: E963, Tagatose
de: E963, Tagatose
el: E963, Ταγατόζη
eo: E963, Tagatozo
es: E963, Tagatosa
et: E963, Tagatoos
fa: E963, تاگاتوز
fi: E963, Tagatoosi
fr: E963, Tagatose
he: E963, טאגאטוז
hi: E963, टैगाटोज़
hr: E963, Tagatoza
hu: E963, tagatóz
id: E963, Tagatosa
it: E963, Tagatosio
ja: E963, タガトース
ko: E963, 타가토스
lt: E963, Tagatozė
lv: E963, Tagatoze
mk: E963, Тагатоза
ms: E963, Tagatosa
mt: E963, Tagatoż
nl: E963, Tagatose
pl: E963, Tagatoza
pt: E963, Tagatose
ro: E963, Tagatoză
ru: E963, Тагатоза
sk: E963, Tagatóza
sl: E963, Tagatoza
sq: E963, Tagatozë
sr: E963, Тагатоза
sv: E963, Tagatos
th: E963, แทกาโทส
tr: E963, Tagatoz
uk: E963, Тагатоза
vi: E963, Tagatose
zh: E963, 塔格糖

en: E964, Polyglycitol syrup
xx: E964
ar: E964, شراب بولي جليسيتول
az: E964, Poligliçitol siropu
bg: E964, Сироп от полиглицитол
ca: E964, Xarop de poliglicitol
cs: E964, Polyglycitol sirup
da: E964, Polyglycitol sirup
de: E964, Polyglycitol-Sirup
el: E964, Σιρόπι πολυγλυκιτόλης
es: E964, Jarabe de poliglicitol
et: E964, Polüglütsitoolisiirup
fi: E964, Polyglysitolisiirappi, Polyglysitolisiirappia
fr: E964, Sirop de polyglycitol
he: E964, סירופ פוליגליציטול
hi: E964, पॉलीग्लिसिटोल सिरप
hu: E964, Poliglicitol szirup
id: E964, Sirup poligliserol
it: E964, Sciroppo di poliglicitolo
ja: E964, ポリグリシトールシロップ
ko: E964, 폴리글리시톨 시럽
lt: E964, Poliglicitolio sirupas
lv: E964, Poliglicīta sīrups
mt: E964, Sirup ta' poligliċitol
nl: E964, Polyglycitol siroop
pl: E964, Syrop poliglicytolowy
pt: E964, Xarope de poliglicitol
ro: E964, Sirop de poliglicitol
ru: E964, Сироп полиглицитола
sk: E964, Sirup polyglycitolu
sl: E964, Sirup poliglicitola
sv: E964, Polyglycitol sirap
th: E964, สารละลายโพลีกลีซีทอล
tr: E964, Poligliserol şurubu
uk: E964, Сироп полігліцитолу
zh: E964, 聚甘油糖醇糖浆

en: E965, maltitol
xx: E965
ar: E965, مالتيتول
bg: E965, Малтитол
ca: E965, Maltitol, maltitols
cs: E965, Maltitol
da: E965, Maltitol
de: E965, Maltit
el: E965, Μαλτιτολες
es: E965, maltitol, maltitoles
et: E965, Maltitool
fa: E965, مالتیتول
fi: E965, maltitoli, maltitolia, maltitolit
fr: E965, maltitol
he: E965, מלטיטול
hr: E965, maltitol, maltitoli
hu: E965, Maltit
it: E965, maltitolo
ja: E965, マルチトール
lt: E965, Maltitolis
lv: E965, Maltīts
mt: E965, Maltitol
nb: E965, Maltitol
nl: E965, Maltitol
pl: E965, Maltitol, maltitole
pt: E965, maltitol
ro: E965, Maltitol
ru: E965, Мальтит
sh: E965, Maltitol
si: E965, මෝල්ටිටෝල්
sk: E965, Maltitol
sl: E965, Maltitol
sr: E965, Малтитол
sv: E965, maltitol, maltitoler
ta: E965, maltitol
uk: E965, Мальтитол
vi: E965, Maltitol
zh: E965, 麦芽糖醇

en: E965(i), D-Maltitol
xx: E965(i)
bg: E965(i), D-малтитол
cs: E965(i), D-maltitol
da: E965(i), D-Maltitol
de: E965(i), D-Maltit
el: E965(i), D-Μαλτιτόλη
es: E965(i), D-Maltitol
et: E965(i), D-maltitool
fi: E965(i), D-maltitoli, D-maltitolia
fr: E965(i), D-Maltitol
hu: E965(i), D-Maltit
it: E965(i), D-maltitolo
lt: E965(i), D-maltitolis
lv: E965(i), D-maltīts
mt: E965(i), D-Morbitol
nl: E965(i), D-Maltitol
pl: E965(i), D-maltitol
pt: E965(i), D-Maltitol
ro: E965(i), D-Maltitol
sk: E965(i), D-Maltitol
sl: E965(i), D-maltitol
sv: E965(i), D-Maltitol

en: E965(ii), Maltitol syrup
xx: E965(ii)
ar: E965(ii), شراب مالتيتول
az: E965(ii), Maltitol siropu
bg: E965(ii), Малтитол сироп
ca: E965(ii), Xarop de maltitol
cs: E965(ii), Maltitol sirup
da: E965(ii), Maltitolsirup
de: E965(ii), Maltitsirup
el: E965(ii), Σιρόπι μαλτιτόλης
eo: E965(ii), Maltitola siropo
es: E965(ii), Jarabe de maltitol
et: E965(ii), Maltitoolisiirup
fa: E965(ii), شربت مالتیتول
fi: E965(ii), Maltitolisiirappi, Maltitolisiirappia
fr: E965(ii), Sirop de maltitol
hr: E965(ii), maltitol sirup
hu: E965(ii), Maltitszirup
id: E965(ii), Sirup Maltitol
it: E965(ii), Sciroppo di maltitolo
ja: E965(ii), マルチトールシロップ
ko: E965(ii), 말티톨 시럽
lt: E965(ii), Maltitolio sirupas
lv: E965(ii), Maltīta sīrups
mt: E965(ii), Ġulepp tal-maltitol
nl: E965(ii), Maltitolstroop
pl: E965(ii), Syrop maltitolowy
pt: E965(ii), Xarope de maltitol
ro: E965(ii), Sirop de maltitol
ru: E965(ii), Мальтитоловый сироп
sk: E965(ii), Maltitolový sirup
sl: E965(ii), Maltitol sirup
sq: E965(ii), Shurup Maltitoli
sr: E965(ii), Maltitol sirup
sv: E965(ii), Maltitolsirap
th: E965(ii), ไซรัปมอลทิทอล
tr: E965(ii), Maltitol şurubu
uk: E965(ii), Мальтитоловий сироп
vi: E965(ii), Sirô Maltitol
zh: E965(ii), 麦芽糖醇糖浆

en: E966, Lactitol, Lactit, Lactositol
xx: E966
bg: E966, Лактитол, Лактит, лактозитол
ca: E966, Lactitol
cs: E966, Laktitol, Laktit, laktositol
da: E966, Lactitol
de: E966, Lactit, Lactitol, E 966
el: E966, Λακτιτολη, Λακτίτης, λακτοζιτόλη
es: E966, Lactitol, Lactita, lactositol, E 966
et: E966, Laktitool, Laktiit, laktositool
fi: E966, Laktitoli, Laktiitti, laktositoli, Laktitolia, Laktiittia, laktositolia
fr: E966, Lactitol, Lactite, lactositol, E 966, 585-86-4
hr: E966, laktitol
hu: E966, Laktit, Laktit, Laktozit, Laktitol
it: E966, Lactitolo, Lactite, lactositolo, Lattitolo
lt: E966, Laktitolis, Laktitas, laktozitolis
lv: E966, Laktīts, Laktīts, laktozīts
mt: E966, Lattitol, Lattit, Lattositol
nl: E966, Lactitol, Lactiet, lactositol
pl: E966, Laktitol, Laktyt, laktozytol
pt: E966, Lactitol, Lactite, lactositol
ro: E966, Lactitol, Lactit, Lactozitol
sk: E966, Laktitol, Laktit, laktositol
sl: E966, Laktitol, laktit, laktozitol
sv: E966, Laktitol, Laktit, laktositol, E 966

en: E967, Xylitol
xx: E967
ar: E967, زيليتول
bg: E967, Ксилитол
ca: E967, Xilitol
cs: E967, Xylitol, E 967
da: E967, Xylitol, E-967, BirkeSød
de: E967, Xylit, Xylitol, E 967, Birkenzucker, Pentanpentol, Pentanpentaol
el: E967, Ξυλιτολη
es: E967, Xilitol, E 967
et: E967, Ksülitool
fa: E967, زایلیتول
fi: E967, Ksylitoli, Ksylitol, 1\,2\,3\,4\,5-pentahydroksipentaani, Koivusokeri, Xylitoli, Xylitol, Ksylitolia, 1\,2\,3\,4\,5-pentahydroksipentaania, Koivusokeria, Xylitolia
fr: E967, Xylitol, D-Xylit, 87-99-0, E 967, 1\,2\,3\,4\,5-pentahydroxypentane
gl: E967, Xilitol
he: E967, קסיליטול
hr: E967, Ksilitol, xylitol
hu: E967, Xilit, Xilitol
it: E967, Xilitolo, Xylit, C5H12O5, Arabitolo, Lixitolo
ja: E967, キシリトール
ko: E967, 자일리톨
lt: E967, Ksilitolis, Ksilitas
lv: E967, Ksilīts
ms: E967, Xilitol
mt: E967, Ksilitol
nb: E967, xylitol
nl: E967, Xylitol, Xilitol
nn: E967, xylitol
pl: E967, Ksylitol
pt: E967, Xilitol
ro: E967, Xilitol, Xylitol
ru: E967, Ксилит
sh: E967, Ksilitol
sk: E967, Xylitol
sl: E967, Xylitol
sr: E967, ксилитол
su: E967, Xylitol
sv: E967, Xylitol, Björksocker, E 967
th: E967, ไซลิทอล
uk: E967, Ксиліт
uz: E967, Ksilit
vi: E967, Xylitol
zh: E967, 木糖醇

en: E968, Erythritol, Meso-erythritol, Tetrahydroxybutane, E-968, E 968
xx: E968
ar: E968, إريثريتول
bg: E968, Еритритол, Мезо-еритритол, тетрахидроксибутан, Еритрит
ca: E968, Eritritol
cs: E968, Erythritol, Meso-erythritol, tetrahydroxybutan
da: E968, Erythritol, Meso-erythritol
de: E968, Erythrit, meso-Erythritol, meso-Butan-1\,2\,3\,4-tetrol, Erythritol
el: E968, Ερυθριτολη, Μεσο-ερυθριτόλη, τετραϋδροξυβουτάνιο
es: E968, Eritritol, Mesoeritritol, tetrahidroxibutano
et: E968, Erütritool, Meso-erütritool, tetrahüdroksübutaan
fa: E968, اریتریتول
fi: E968, Erytritoli, Meso-erytritoli, tetrahydroksibutaani
fr: E968, Érythritol, Méso-érythritol, tétrahydroxybutane
ga: E968, eiritríotól
he: E968, אריתריטול
hi: E968, इरिथ्रोटोल
hu: E968, Eritrit, mezo-Eritrit, Eritritol
it: E968, Eritritolo, Meso-eritritolo, tetraidrossibutano
ja: E968, エリトリトール
ko: E968, 에리트리톨
lt: E968, Eritritolis, Mezo-eritritolis, tetrahidroksibutanas
lv: E968, Eritritols, Mezo-eritrols, Tetrahidroksibutāns
mt: E968, Eritritol, Meso-eritritol, Tetraidrossibutan
nb: E968, erytritol
nl: E968, Erytritol, Meso-erytritol, tetrahydroxybutaan
pl: E968, Ertytrytol, Mezo-erytrytol, tetrahydroksybutan, Erytrytol, Erytryt, Erytritol
pt: E968, Eritritol, Meso-eritritol, tetra-hidroxibutano
ro: E968, Eritritol, Mezo-eritritol, Tetrahidroxibutan
sh: E968, Eritritol
sk: E968, erytritol, Mezo-erytritol, tetrahydroxybután
sl: E968, Eritritol, mezo-eritritol, tetrahidroksibutan
sr: E968, Eritritol
sv: E968, Erytritol, Meso-erytritol, tetrahydroxibutan
vi: E968, Erythritol
zh: E968, 赤藓醇

en: E969, Advantame
xx: E969

en: E999, Quillaia extract, Soapbark extract, Quillay bark extract, Panama bark extract, Quillai extract, Murillo bark extract, Quillaia
xx: E999
bg: E999, Куилая екстракт
ca: E999, Extracte de quil·laia
cs: E999, Extrakt z kvillaji
da: E999, Quillaiaekstrakt synonymer —
de: E999, Quillajaextrakt, Quillajarindenextrakt, Panamarindenextrakt, Seifenrindenextrakt
el: E999, Εκχυλισμα κιλαϊας, Εκχύλισμα φλοιού κουιλαΐας, εκχύλισμα φλοιού του Παναμά, εκχύλισμα κουιλαΐας, εκχύλισμα φλοιού Murillo
es: E999, Extracto de quilaya, Extracto de jabón de corteza, extracto de corteza de quilaya, extracto de corteza de Panamá, extracto de quillay, extracto de corteza de murillo, Quillajaceae
et: E999, Seebikoorepuu ekstrakt
fi: E999, Kvillaiauute, Saippuakuoriuute, kvillaiankuoriuute, panamankuoriuute, murillonkuoriuute, Kvillaiauutetta, Saippuakuoriuutetta, kvillaiankuoriuutetta, panamankuoriuutetta, murillonkuoriuutetta
fr: E999, Extraits de quillaia, Extrait de quillaia de type 1, Extrait de quillaia de type 2, Extrait de quillaia type 1, Extrait de quillaia type 2, Extrait de quillaia, quillaia extract, Extrait de bois de Panama, extrait d'écorce de Panama, Quillajaceae
hu: E999, Quillajakivonat, Szappanfakéreg-kivonat, Quillajakéreg-kivonat, Panamakéreg-kivonat, Murillokéreg-kivonat
it: E999, Estratto di quillaia
lt: E999, Muiliaus ekstraktas, Muilo žievės ekstraktas, Quillay žievės ekstraktas, Panamos žievės ekstraktas, Quillai ekstraktas, Murillo žievės ekstraktas, Kualajos ekstraktas
lv: E999, Kvilajas ekstrakts, Ziepju mizas ekstrakts, kvilaijas mizas ekstrakts, Panamas mizas ekstrakts, kvilai ekstrakts, Muriljo mizas ekstrakts
mt: E999, Estratt tal-kwillaja, Estratt tas-soapbark, estratt tal-qoxra tal-kwillaja, estratt tal-qoxra tal-Panama, Estratt tal-kwillaj, estratt tal-qoxra tal-Murillo
nl: E999, Quillaja-extract, Zeepbastextract, quillajabastextract, Panamabastextract, Murillobastextract, Quillajaceae
pl: E999, Ekstrakt quillaia, Wyciąg z kory mydłoki, wyciąg z kory quillay, wyciąg z kory Panama, wyciąg Quillai, wyciąg z kory Murillo
pt: E999, Extracto de quilaia, Quillajaceae
ro: E999, Extract de quillaia
sk: E999, Extrakt quillaia, Extrakt z mydlovej kôry, extrakt z kôry kviláje, extrakt z panamskej kôry, Quillai extrakt, extrakt z murilovej kôry
sl: E999, Izvleček quillaia, izvleček saponinov iz lubja, izvleček lubja Quillay, izvleček lubja paname, izvleček Quillaia, izvleček lubja murillo
sv: E999, Kvillajaextrakt, Såpbarkextrakt, kvillajabarksextrakt